Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 28 Fences and Cattle Guards

Cross references. —

As to estrays generally, see §§

11-24-101

to

11-24-115

.

As to swine, goats or elk running at large, see §

11-26-101

.

As to enclosure of livestock district by lawful fence, and as to cattle guards, etc., in connection with livestock district, see §

11-33-105

.

As to requiring legislature to provide for the protection of livestock and stock owners, see art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to placing handbills, on buildings and fences, see §

6-3-202

.

As to construction and repair of fences by highway department, see §

24-1-112

.

As to removal of fences on right-of-way whenever a public road is ordered to be established or altered, see §

24-3-124

.

As to livestock roaming at large in Hot Springs state park, see §

36-8-316

.

As to fireguards and fences in connection with railroads generally, see
§§

37-9-301

to

37-9-310

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 28, 32, 36-41, 43, 46; 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 48 to 77, 123 to 133; 35A Am. Jur. 2d Fences § 1 et seq; 65 Am. Jur. 2d Railroads §§ 92 to 101.

Fence as nuisance, 80 ALR3d 962.

Liability of person, other than owner of animal or owner or operator of motor vehicle, for damage to motor vehicle or injury to person riding therein resulting from collision with domestic animal at large in street or highway, 21 ALR4th 132.

Liability for killing or injuring, by motor vehicle, livestock or fowl on highway, 55 ALR4th 822.

Encroachment of trees, shrubbery or other vegetation across boundary line, 65 ALR4th 603.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 48 to 53, 139, 140, 142, 149, 241 to 245, 251, 265 to 268, 274, 329; 36A C.J.S. Fences §§ 1 to 23.

§ 11-28-101.
Who considered owner.

Any person occupying,
using, enjoying, maintaining or having the charge of any enclosure
shall be considered the owner thereof, in any action commenced under
the provisions of W.S.

11-28-101

through

11-28-108

.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 33, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 1974; C.S. 1910, § 2579; C.S. 1920, § 3072; R.S. 1931, § 42-102; C.S. 1945, § 66-506; W.S. 1957, § 11-531; W.S. 1977, §

11-33-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Effect of fence law. —

Though at common law the owner of cattle is required to take care of them, and if they trespass, the owner is responsible, even if there be no fence, this rule in many cases was not held applicable in sparsely settled sections where legislation defining lawful fences has been enacted. Hecht v. Harrison, 5 Wyo. 279, 40 P. 306,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1895).

Applied

in

Brunner v. Bunn, 487 P.2d 319,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 11-28-102.
Lawful fences generally.

The following are lawful fences in this state:

A fence made of steel, concrete or sound wooden posts and three (3) spans of barbed wire not more than fifteen (15) inches or less than ten (10) inches apart, or two (2) spans of barbed wire with a wooden rail on top. Wooden posts shall be at least four (4) inches in diameter. Posts shall be set firmly in the ground at least twenty (20) inches deep, at no greater distance apart than twenty-two (22) feet between the posts or thirty-three (33) feet with at least two (2) iron or wooden stays between the posts. Stays shall be placed equal distance apart from themselves and the post on either side;

A post and board fence made of sound posts not less than four (4) inches in diameter set substantially in the ground not more than ten (10) feet apart, with three (3) boards sold as one (1) inch lumber eight (8) inches wide, and not more than ten (10) inches apart, or four (4) boards sold as one (1) inch lumber six (6) inches wide, not more than eight (8) inches apart, securely fastened with nails or otherwise;

A four (4) pole fence with round poles not less than two (2) inches in diameter at the small end, with either upright or leaning posts not more than sixteen (16) feet apart, and securely fastened with nails, wires or otherwise.

All other fences made and constructed of boards, rails, poles, stones, hedge plants or other material which upon evidence is declared to be as strong and well calculated to protect enclosures, and is as effective for resisting breaching stock as those described in subsection (a) of this section, shall be considered a lawful fence.

Any fence enclosing any hay corral situated outside of any field or pasture enclosed by a lawful fence, shall be at least six (6) feet high, constructed of boards, poles or wire. The posts shall not be more than eight (8) feet apart and set twenty-four (24) inches in the ground. If the fence is constructed of barbed wire there shall be at least seven (7) spans of wire, and all wires shall be kept properly stretched. Any fence better than the above described fence is a lawful fence.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 46, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 4192; Laws 1888, ch. 33, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1973; C.S. 1910, § 2578; Laws 1917, ch. 78, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3071; R.S. 1931, § 42-101; C.S. 1945, § 66-501; Laws 1953, ch. 103, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-532; W.S. 1977, §

11-33-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to duty of railroad to fence right-of-way, see §§

37-9-304

and

37-9-305

.

While section defines lawful fence, it does not define unlawful fence.

Stilwell v. Nation, 363 P.2d 916,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1961).

And does not prohibit fences other than those prescribed. —

Bearing in mind that Wyoming has always been an open-range state in the sense that the owner of cattle or horses is not required to confine them or to prevent them from straying or wandering upon the unenclosed premises of another, it is clear that the object of this section was merely to prescribe such a fence as would enable landowners to enforce certain remedies against the owners of trespassing animals and not to prohibit other kinds of fences. Stilwell v. Nation, 363 P.2d 916,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1961).

If unlawful fence becomes lawful, individual maintaining fence may be entitled to reimbursement

under §

11-28-106

for the period beginning when the fence became lawful. Thus, neither res judicata nor collateral estoppel would prevent an owner of a fence from attempting to prove the fence became legal after a first suit under subsection (b) of this section was dismissed, because it was “as effective for resisting breaching stock as those described in subsection (a).” Osborn v. Manning, 798 P.2d 1208,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied, 812 P.2d 549,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1991).

Section inapplicable to fence to prevent vehicles from trespassing
on trailer court. —

This section pertains to fences for livestock and animals and has no application to a single strand barbed wire across one side of a trailer court for the purpose of preventing vehicles from trespassing to and from adjacent property. Stilwell v. Nation, 363 P.2d 916,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1961).

Provisions as to fences enclosing hay corrals not applicable
to city lots. —

The provision of this section relative to “Any fence enclosing any hay corral situated outside of any field or pasture enclosed by a lawful fence” should not be applied to lots in a town or city. It was passed to meet situations in agricultural areas. Sowers v. Corthell, 69 Wyo. 215, 240 P.2d 891,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1952).

Common law not applicable. —

Common-law rule requiring cattle owner to restrain cattle does not apply, and owner of such animals has right to permit them to run at large, and they commit no actionable trespass if they stray upon unenclosed lands. Garretson v. Avery, 26 Wyo. 53, 176 P. 433,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1918).

Landowner's duties. —

As a general rule, where no obligation rests upon a landowner to fence out another's livestock, the owner of unenclosed lands is under no duty to make or keep them in a safe condition for stock straying thereon. Garretson v. Avery, 26 Wyo. 53, 176 P. 433,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1918).

Landowner's rights. —

While owner of land who permits same to remain unenclosed may thereby subject it to use for grazing purposes by cattle of adjoining owner, he may at any time prevent such use by erection of a fence on one or more sides of his premises; and it is not necessary for him to enclose his land completely by erecting fences on the other sides, and thereby segregate it from the public domain. Anthony Wilkinson Live Stock Co. v. McIlquam, 14 Wyo. 209, 83 P. 364,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1905).

No liability for death of cow straying into field with dangerous
feed. —

This section, defining lawful fence, including therein barbed-wire, post and pole, and board fences, and §

11-28-103

, making all persons maintaining any unlawful wire fence liable in a civil action for damages to animals, “by reason of such unlawful enclosure,” did not make landowner maintaining barbed-wire fence other than described in statute liable for death of cow which strayed into alfalfa field, when the alfalfa was a dangerous feed, the words “unlawful enclosure” meaning merely “fence.” Garretson v. Avery, 26 Wyo. 53, 176 P. 433,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1918).

Applied

in

Osborn v. Manning, 685 P.2d 1121,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1984); Osborn v. Manning, 817 P.2d 889,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

For note on the open range and fencing, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 136 (1959).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statutes requiring the construction of fences—modern cases, 87 ALR4th 1129.

§ 11-28-103.
Constructing of unlawful wire fence; liability and penalty; reconstruction
required; penalty for failure.

Any person who constructs or maintains any unlawful wire fence contrary to this chapter, is liable in a civil action for all damages to animals that may occur by reason of the unlawful enclosure. The owner of any unlawful wire fence is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than twenty–five dollars ($25.00), and for each subsequent offense the fine shall not be less than twenty–five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

The owner of any unlawful wire fence shall, within thirty (30) days after conviction, reconstruct the wire fence into a lawful wire fence. If he fails or refuses to do so, the owner is guilty of a separate offense and on conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in subsection (a) of this section. Each period of thirty (30) days thereafter that the owner refuses or neglects to reconstruct the unlawful fence is a separate offense and the owner is subject to like punishment.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 33, §§ 2, 5; R.S. 1899, §§ 1982, 1983; C.S. 1910, §§ 2587, 2588; C.S. 1920, §§ 3080, 3081; R.S. 1931, §§ 42-110, 42-111; C.S. 1945, §§ 66-502, 66-505; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-533, 11-535; W.S. 1977, §§

11-33-103

,

11-33-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

“Unlawful enclosure.” —

Landowner maintaining barbed-wire fence other than described by statute is not liable for death of a cow which strayed into an alfalfa field, when the alfalfa was a dangerous feed, the words “unlawful enclosure” meaning merely “fence.” Garretson v. Avery, 26 Wyo. 53, 176 P. 433,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1918).

Cited

in

Garretson v. Avery, 26 Wyo. 53, 176 P. 433,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1918).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “chapter” for “act” following “contrary to this.”

§ 11-28-104.
Fences across roads generally.

All fences constructed
across a road leading to a watering place, or constructed across any
road used as a public road, shall at the point where the fence intersects
or crosses the road be constructed of boards or poles extending not
less than eight (8) feet on each side of the middle of the road. The
owner of any fence that violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor
and shall be punished as provided in W.S. 11-28-103(a).

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 33, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 1985; C.S. 1910, § 2590; C.S. 1920, § 3083; R.S. 1931, § 42-113; C.S. 1945, § 66-504; W.S. 1957, § 11-536; W.S. 1977, §

11-33-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for failure to remove fence from public road, see §

24-3-124

.

Cited

in

Meyer v. Ellis, 411 P.2d 338,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1966).

§ 11-28-105.
Board of county commissioners to authorize lawful fences upon right-of-way.

The board of county commissioners
may authorize the erection of a lawful fence upon the right-of-way
of any public road at the expense of the petitioners for the establishment
of the roads, or as may be agreed upon between petitioners and the
board of county commissioners, or at the expense of the owners of
lands to be benefited by the fencing or at the expense of the county,
as the board of county commissioners may determine. The board shall
locate and cause to be constructed gates and cattle guards at such
intervals as it deems necessary for the convenience of the public.
Cattle guards shall be constructed according to specification prescribed
by the state highway department, under the supervision of the county
surveyor or county commissioners at the expense of the petitioners,
the land owners who may be benefited, or the county as the board of
county commissioners may determine.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 39, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 2591; C.S. 1920, § 3084; Laws 1929, ch. 78, § 1; 1931, ch. 104, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 42-114; C.S. 1945, § 66-514; W.S. 1957, § 11-537; W.S. 1977, §

11-33-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for failure to remove fence from public road, see §

24-3-124

.

Quoted

in

Meyer v. Ellis, 411 P.2d 338,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1966).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of governmental entity for damage to motor vehicle or injury to person riding therein resulting from collision between vehicle and domestic animal at large in street or highway, 52 ALR4th 1200.

§ 11-28-106.
Construction
and maintenance of partition fences.

Except as otherwise provided, the owner of any lawful fence which is or becomes a partition fence separating the owner’s land from that belonging to some other person may require the person to pay for one-half (1/2) of what it would or does actually cost to construct the partition fence. In case of refusal, the owner may maintain a civil action against the person refusing and is entitled to recover one-half (1/2) of what it would or did actually cost to construct that portion of the partition fence used by the person and costs of suit. The joint users of a partition fence shall contribute to the cost of maintenance in proportion to their respective interests and if either refuses to pay his share of the cost of maintenance, the other may recover maintenance costs in the manner provided for recovering the cost of construction.

For subdivisions as defined in W.S. 18-5-302(a)(vii), the subdivider shall be responsible for the construction of a perimeter partition fence on any part of the subdivision adjacent to lands upon which livestock can be legally run at large. The costs of the perimeter partition fence shall be paid for by the parties in accordance with subsection (a) of this section. The adjoining landowner shall not be liable for any damages caused by, or arising from, livestock pastured on the adjoining land that may wander onto the subdivided land.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 33, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 1975; C.S. 1910, § 2580; C.S. 1920, § 3073; Laws 1929, ch. 40, § 1; 1945, ch. 21, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 66-507; W.S. 1957, § 11-538; W.S. 1977, §

11-33-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2011, ch. 102, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), added “Except as otherwise provided”; and added (b).

Duty to fence. —

It is not the duty of a landowner to fence against cattle of another unless such duty has arisen by prescription or is specifically declared by contract or by law. Garretson v. Avery, 26 Wyo. 53, 176 P. 433,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1918).

If unlawful fence becomes lawful, individual maintaining fence may be entitled to reimbursement

under this section for the period beginning when the fence became lawful. Thus, neither res judicata nor collateral estoppel would prevent an owner of a fence from attempting to prove the fence became legal after a first suit under § 11-28-102(b) was dismissed, because it was “as effective for resisting breaching stock as those described in subsection (a).” Osborn v. Manning, 798 P.2d 1208,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied, 812 P.2d 549,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1991).

Applied

in

Osborn v. Manning, 685 P.2d 1121,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

For note on the open range and fencing, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 136 (1959).

§ 11-28-107.
Prohibited acts; penalties.

Any person who willfully
or negligently leaves open, breaks down or destroys any bars or gate
provided for the use and convenience of the public, or willfully tears
down, throws down or destroys in any manner any lawful fence, is guilty
of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars
($100.00), or imprisoned not more than three (3) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 46, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 4193; R.S. 1899, § 1981; C.S. 1910, § 2586; C.S. 1920, § 3079; R.S. 1931, § 42-109; C. S. 1945, § 66-508; W. S. 1957, § 11-539; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-109; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-28-108.
Liability
for breach into lawful enclosure by animal; civil action or arbitration.

Any person owning or having in his possession or charge any livestock or domesticated buffalo which breaches into any lawful enclosure belonging to someone other than the owner of the animal, is liable to the party sustaining the injury for all damages sustained by reason of such breaching. Damages may be recovered in a civil action before any court having jurisdiction, or by arbitration, each party to select a property holder and the two (2) arbitrators to select a third. The arbitrators shall be sworn before a judge of a circuit court before entering upon their duties. The arbitrators shall carefully examine the fence and assess the damage done, examine witnesses under oath, one (1) of them to administer the oath to the witnesses, and make a written report signed by at least two (2) of the arbitrators, to the circuit court in the county in which the damage is sustained. The finding of the arbitration, as provided for in this section, shall within three (3) days after rendered, be filed with a judge of a circuit court in the county where the trespass was committed, who shall enter the cost upon his docket and proceed to issue execution therein as in other cases originally commenced before him.

The party sustaining the damage shall notify the owner or person having in charge the offending animals, of the damage and the probable amount if he knows to whom the animals belong and if the owner or keeper resides within the county where the damage was committed.

The person suffering damage may restrain and keep in custody as many of the offending animals as are equal in value to the damage done, until the finding of the court or arbitration is ascertained, unless before suit the amount of his claim and expense of keeping the animals is tendered to him.

If, upon trial of any action under subsection (a) of this section, it appears the plaintiff’s enclosure is a lawful fence, he shall be allowed to prove the amount of damage sustained and if he has retained in custody the animals committing the damage, the amount of expense incurred for keeping the animals. Any judgment rendered for damages, costs and expenses against the defendant shall be a lien upon the animals committing the damage. If it appears upon trial that the plaintiff’s enclosure is not a lawful fence or that no damage was sustained, judgment shall be rendered against the plaintiff for costs of suit and damages sustained by defendant.

If upon trial it appears the defendant is not the owner or person in charge of the offending animals, he shall be discharged from the action with his costs, and the suit may proceed against a defendant whose name is unknown. If, at the commencement of the action, the plaintiff does not know the name of the owner or keeper of the offending animals, he may bring suit against a defendant unknown.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 51, §§ 3, 5 to 8; R.S. 1887, §§ 4185, 4187 to 4190; R.S. 1899, §§ 1976 to 1980; C.S. 1910, §§ 2581 to 2585; C.S. 1920, §§ 3074 to 3078; R.S. 1931, §§ 42-104 to 42-108; C.S. 1945, §§ 66-509 to 66-513; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-540 to 11-544; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-33-110 to 11-33-114; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1979, ch. 144, § 1; 1996, ch. 69, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), deleted references to a “justice of the peace” three times and made stylistic changes

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

“Enclosure,” as used in this section, means “fence.”

Garretson v. Avery, 26 Wyo. 53, 176 P. 433,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1918).

Applied

in

Blakely v. State, 474 P.2d 127,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1970).